District of Columbia statutes.
32-1603.01

WIA administrative entity.

The Mayor shall designate an agency to serve as the WIA administrative entity, which shall:

(1)

In cooperation with the WIC:

(A)

Develop the District’s state plan;

(B)

Negotiate the District’s state performance measures as required under section 136(b) of the Federal Act;

(C)

Develop the District’s annual report as required under section 136(d) of the Federal Act;

(D)

Develop and submit all reports required under the Federal Act; and

(E)

Advise the Mayor and the Office of the Chief Financial Officer of the District of Columbia on the annual budget and spending plan for youth activities as described in section 129 of the Federal Act and employment and training activities as described in section 134 of the Federal Act;

(2)

Serve as the fiscal agent for all funds described in section 127 and section 132 of the Federal Act;

(3)

Develop and administer a District-wide employment statistics system consistent with section 309 of the Federal Act;

(4)

Subject to certification by WIC:

(A)

Serve as the operator of American Job Centers;

(B)

Provide core services as described in section 134(d)(2) of the Federal Act through the American Job Centers; and

(C)

Provide intensive services as described in section 134(d)(3) of the Federal Act through the American Job Centers;

(5)

Administer all grants and contracts for training services as described in section 134(d)(4) of the Federal Act, subject to policies established by WIC; and

(6)

Administer all grants and contracts with youth providers identified by WIC through the process described in §  32-1610.01.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-150, § 4a
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-263, § 2(c), 62 DCR 1518

History